Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB388.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 62WATER AND SEWER PROJECTSSec.6201. Definitions.6202. Private sewer lateral and private water lateral projects.§ 6201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"American-made." Produced, manufactured, mined, grown or performed in the United States. For the purpose of this 123456789101112131415161718 definition, produced or manufactured shall mean assembled in a location within the United States."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or township in this Commonwealth."Private sewer lateral." A line on a property upon which a building or structure is located that connects to a public sewer system."Private water lateral." A line on a property upon which a building or structure is located that connects to a public water supply system.§ 6202. Private sewer lateral and private water lateral projects.(a) Replacement or remediation.--A municipality may perform the replacement or remediation of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral for residents of the municipality if the municipality determines that the replacement or remediation will benefit the public health, public water supply system or public sewer system. A municipality that has performed a replacement or remediation authorized under this subsection may not be deemed to be the owner of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral and may not be required to perform any other duties unless determined necessary by the municipality.(b) Public money and municipal employees.-- A municipality may use public money or municipal employees for the replacement or remediation of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral if the municipality determines that the replacement or remediation will benefit the public health, public water supply system or public sewer system. Before using public money or municipal employees as authorized under this subsection, the municipality shall consider the availability of public money, 20250HB0388PN0353 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment, municipal employees and facilities and the competing demands of the municipality for the public funds, equipment, municipal employees and facilities.(c) Prioritization.-- (1) A municipality shall utilize American-made supplies in the replacement or remediation authorized under subsection (a).(2) If the governing body of the municipality determines that a particular supply is not American-made, or is American-made but not available in sufficient quantities to meet the needs of the municipality, the governing body of the municipality shall publish a notice of the determination in no less than two newspapers of general circulation within the municipality and on each of the municipality's social media and publicly accessible Internet websites.(3) Beginning on the date of publication of the notice under paragraph (2) and until 30 days thereafter, a person or business may file an objection to the determination in a form and manner determined by the governing body of the municipality. A person or business shall include evidence of the particular supply being American-made or evidence of the particular supply being American-made and available in sufficient quantities. An objection under this paragraph shall be considered an appeal under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. B (relating to judicial review of local agency action).(4) If, after the adjudication of the objection under paragraph (3), the determination under paragraph (2) is affirmed, the requirements under subsection (a) shall not apply for the particular supply.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0388PN0353 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930